Utah statutes.
20A-8-402.    Political party officers -- Submission of names of officers to the lieutenant governor.

(1)  Each state political party shall:

(a)  designate a party officer to act as liaison with the lieutenant governor's office; and

(b)  within seven days of any change in the party liaison, submit the name of the new liaison to the lieutenant governor.

(2)  Each state political party and each county political party shall:

(a)  submit the names of its officers to the lieutenant governor within seven days after the officers are selected; and

(b)  within seven days of any change in party officers, submit the names of the new officers to the lieutenant governor.

